New York, session 2025-2026, A10975.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 168-b of the correction law, as 2 amended by chapter 106 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 6. The division shall also establish a [subdirectory] directory pursu- 5 ant to section one hundred sixty-eight-q of this article. 6 § 2. Paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subdivision 6 of section 168-l of 7 the correction law, paragraph (a) as amended by chapter 106 of the laws 8 of 2006, paragraph (b) as amended by chapter 513 of the laws of 2011 and 9 paragraph (c) as separately amended by chapters 318 and 680 of the laws 10 of 2005, are amended to read as follows: 11 (a) If the risk of repeat offense is low, a level one designation 12 shall be given to such sex offender. In such case the law enforcement 13 agency or agencies having jurisdiction and the law enforcement agency or 14 agencies having had jurisdiction at the time of [his or her] such 15 offender's conviction shall be notified and may disseminate relevant 16 information which may include a photograph and description of the offen- 17 der and which may include the name of the sex offender, approximate 18 address based on sex offender's zip code, background information includ- 19 ing the offender's crime of conviction, modus of operation, type of 20 victim targeted, the name and address of any institution of higher 21 education at which the sex offender is enrolled, attends, is employed or 22 resides and the description of special conditions imposed on the offen- 23 der to any entity with vulnerable populations related to the nature of 24 the offense committed by such sex offender. Any entity receiving infor- 25 mation on a sex offender may disclose or further disseminate such infor- 26 mation at its discretion. In addition, in each such case, the name of 27 the sex offender, a photograph of the sex offender, approximate address 28 based on the sex offender's zip code, and background information includ- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15521-01-6 A. 10975 2 1 ing the offender's crime of conviction, mode of operation, and type of 2 victim targeted may also be provided in the directory established in 3 this article and notwithstanding any other provision of law, such infor- 4 mation shall, upon request, be made available to the public. 5 (b) If the risk of repeat offense is moderate, a level two designation 6 shall be given to such sex offender. In such case the law enforcement 7 agency or agencies having jurisdiction and the law enforcement agency or 8 agencies having had jurisdiction at the time of [his or her] such 9 offender's conviction shall be notified and may disseminate relevant 10 information which shall include a photograph and description of the 11 offender and which may include the exact name and any aliases used by 12 the sex offender, exact address, background information including the 13 offender's crime of conviction, mode of operation, type of victim 14 targeted, the name and address of any institution of higher education at 15 which the sex offender is enrolled, attends, is employed or resides and 16 the description of special conditions imposed on the offender to any 17 entity with vulnerable populations related to the nature of the offense 18 committed by such sex offender. Any entity receiving information on a 19 sex offender may disclose or further disseminate such information at its 20 discretion. In addition, in such case, the information described [here- 21 in] in this paragraph shall also be provided in the [subdirectory] 22 directory established in this article and notwithstanding any other 23 provision of law, such information shall, upon request, be made avail- 24 able to the public. 25 Such law enforcement agencies shall compile, maintain and update a 26 listing of vulnerable organizational entities within its jurisdiction. 27 Such listing shall be utilized for notification of such organizations in 28 disseminating such information on level two sex offenders pursuant to 29 this paragraph. Such listing shall include and not be limited to: 30 superintendents of schools or chief school administrators, superinten- 31 dents of parks, public and private libraries, public and private school 32 bus transportation companies, day care centers, nursery schools, pre- 33 schools, neighborhood watch groups, community centers, civic associ- 34 ations, nursing homes, victim's advocacy groups and places of worship. 35 (c) If the risk of repeat offense is high and there exists a threat to 36 the public safety a level three designation shall be given to such sex 37 offender. In such case, the law enforcement agency or agencies having 38 jurisdiction and the law enforcement agency or agencies having had 39 jurisdiction at the time of [his or her] such offender's conviction 40 shall be notified and may disseminate relevant information which shall 41 include a photograph and description of the offender and which may 42 include the sex offender's exact name and any aliases used by the offen- 43 der, exact address, address of the offender's place of employment, back- 44 ground information including the offender's crime of conviction, mode of 45 operation, type of victim targeted, the name and address of any institu- 46 tion of higher education at which the sex offender is enrolled, attends, 47 is employed or resides and the description of special conditions imposed 48 on the offender to any entity with vulnerable populations related to the 49 nature of the offense committed by such sex offender. Any entity receiv- 50 ing information on a sex offender may disclose or further disseminate 51 such information at its discretion. In addition, in such case, the 52 information described [herein] in this paragraph shall also be provided 53 in the [subdirectory] directory established in this article and notwith- 54 standing any other provision of law, such information shall, upon 55 request, be made available to the public. A. 10975 3 1 Such law enforcement agencies shall compile, maintain and update a 2 listing of vulnerable organizational entities within its jurisdiction. 3 Such listing shall be utilized for notification of such organizations in 4 disseminating such information on level three sex offenders pursuant to 5 this paragraph. Such listing shall include and not be limited to: 6 superintendents of schools or chief school administrators, superinten- 7 dents of parks, public and private libraries, public and private school 8 bus transportation companies, day care centers, nursery schools, pre- 9 schools, neighborhood watch groups, community centers, civic associ- 10 ations, nursing homes, victim's advocacy groups and places of worship. 11 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 168-n of the correction law, as amended 12 by chapter 453 of the laws of 1999, is amended to read as follows: 13 2. In addition, applying the guidelines established in subdivision 14 five of section one hundred sixty-eight-l of this article, the sentenc- 15 ing court shall also make a determination with respect to the level of 16 notification, after receiving a recommendation from the board pursuant 17 to section one hundred sixty-eight-l of this article. [Both] For any 18 offender designated a level one offender, the court shall determine 19 whether their name, photograph, approximate address based on the sex 20 offender's zip code, and other background information shall be provided 21 in the directory established in this article after receiving a recommen- 22 dation from the board pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision six of 23 section one hundred sixty-eight-l of this article. In making such deter- 24 mination, the court shall consider, but not be limited to, the guide- 25 lines set forth under subdivision five of section one hundred sixty- 26 eight-l of this article. Such determinations of the sentencing court 27 shall be made thirty calendar days prior to discharge, parole or 28 release. 29 § 4. Section 168-q of the correction law, as added by chapter 192 of 30 the laws of 1995, the section heading as amended by chapter 106 of the 31 laws of 2006 and subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 462 of the laws of 32 2014, is amended to read as follows: 33 § 168-q. [Subdirectory] Directory; internet posting. 1. The division 34 shall maintain a [subdirectory] directory of [level two and three] sex 35 offenders[. The subdirectory] which shall be made available at all times 36 on the internet via the division homepage for purposes of public access. 37 (a) In the case of a sex offender who has been given a level one 38 designation, the directory may include the name of the sex offender, a 39 photograph of the sex offender, approximate address based on the sex 40 offender's zip code, and background information including the offender's 41 crime of conviction, modus of operation, and type of victim targeted 42 pursuant to subdivision two of section one hundred sixty-eight-n of this 43 article. 44 (b) In the case of a sex offender who has been given a level two or 45 three designation, the directory shall include the exact address, 46 address of the offender's place of employment and photograph of the sex 47 offender along with the following information, if available: name, phys- 48 ical description, age and distinctive markings. Background information 49 including all of the sex offender's crimes of conviction that require 50 [him or her] such offender to register pursuant to this article, modus 51 of operation, type of victim targeted, the name and address of any 52 institution of higher education at which the sex offender is enrolled, 53 attends, is employed or resides and a description of special conditions 54 imposed on the sex offender shall also be included. The [subdirectory] 55 directory shall have sex offender listings categorized by county and zip 56 code. Such [subdirectory] directory shall be made available at all times A. 10975 4 1 on the internet via the division homepage. Any person may apply to the 2 division to receive automated e-mail notifications whenever a new or 3 updated [subdirectory] directory registration occurs in a geographic 4 area specified by such person. The division shall furnish such service 5 at no charge to such person, who shall request e-mail notification by 6 county and/or zip code on forms developed and provided by the division. 7 E-mail notification is limited to three geographic areas per e-mail 8 account. 9 2. Any person who uses information disclosed pursuant to this section 10 in violation of the law shall in addition to any other penalty or fine 11 imposed, be subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars and 12 not more than one thousand dollars. Unauthorized removal or duplication 13 of the [subdirectory] directory from the offices of local, village or 14 city police department shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed one 15 thousand dollars. In addition, the attorney general, any district attor- 16 ney, or any person aggrieved is authorized to bring a civil action in 17 the appropriate court requesting preventive relief, including an appli- 18 cation for a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or 19 other order against the person or group of persons responsible for such 20 action. The foregoing remedies shall be independent of any other reme- 21 dies or procedures that may be available to an aggrieved party under 22 other provisions of law. 23 § 5. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 24 it shall have become a law.